Maryland, session 2026, HB0778.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Land Use
1–401.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0778*

HOUSE BILL 778
(a) Except as provided in this section, this division does not apply to charter
counties.
(b) The following provisions of this division apply to a charter county:
(1) this subtitle, including Parts II and III (Charter county –
Comprehensive plans);
(2) § 1–101(l), (m), and (o) (Definitions – “Plan”, “Priority funding area”,
and “Sensitive area”);
(3) § 1–201 (Visions);
(4) § 1–206 (Required education);
(5) § 1–207 (Annual report – In general);
(6) § 1–208 (Annual report – Measures and indicators);
(7) Title 1, Subtitle 3 (Consistency);
(8) Title 1, Subtitle 5 (Growth Tiers);
(9) § 4–104(c) (Limitations – Bicycle parking);
(10) § 4–104(d) (Limitations – Manufactured homes and modular dwellings);
(11) § 4–208 (Exceptions – Maryland Accessibility Code);
(12) § 4–210 (Permits and variances – Solar panels);
(13) § 4–211 (Change in zoning classification – Energy generating systems);
(14) § 4–212 (Agritourism);
(15) § 4–213 (Alcohol production);
(16) § 4–214 (Agricultural alcohol production);
(17) § 4–215 (Pollinator–friendly vegetation management);
(18) § 4–216 (Limitations – Family child care homes and large family child
care homes);
(19) Title 4, Subtitle 5 (Accessory Dwelling Units);
(20) TITLE 4, SUBTITLE 6 (MIDDLE HOUSING);

HOUSE BILL 778 3
(21) § 5–102(d) (Subdivision regulations – Burial sites);
[(21)] (22) § 5–104 (Major subdivision – Review);
[(22)] (23) Title 7, Subtitle 1 (Development Mechanisms);
[(23)] (24) Title 7, Subtitle 2 (Transfer of Development Rights);
[(24)] (25) except in Montgomery County or Prince George’s County, Title
7, Subtitle 3 (Development Rights and Responsibilities Agreements);
[(25)] (26) Title 7, Subtitle 4 (Inclusionary Zoning);
[(26)] (27) Title 7, Subtitle 5 (Housing Expansion and Affordability);
[(27)] (28) § 8–401 (Conversion of overhead facilities);
[(28)] (29) for Baltimore County only, Title 9, Subtitle 3 (Single–County
Provisions – Baltimore County);
[(29)] (30) for Frederick County only, Title 9, Subtitle 10 (Single–County
Provisions – Frederick County);
[(30)] (31) for Howard County only, Title 9, Subtitle 13 (Single–County
Provisions – Howard County);
[(31)] (32) for Talbot County only, Title 9, Subtitle 18 (Single–County
Provisions – Talbot County); and
[(32)] (33) Title 11, Subtitle 2 (Civil Penalty).
(c) This section supersedes any inconsistent provision of Division II of this article.
1–407.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Affirmatively further fair housing” has the meaning stated in § 2–401
of the Housing and Community Development Article.
(3) “Area median income” has the meaning stated in § 4–1801 of the
Housing and Community Development Article.
(4) “Low–income housing” means housing that is affordable for a household
with an aggregate annual income that is below 60% of the area median income.

HOUSE BILL 778
(5) “Workforce housing” has the meaning stated in § 4–1801 of the Housing
and Community Development Article.
(b) A housing element may include goals, objectives, policies, plans, and
standards.
(c) A housing element shall address the need for affordable housing within the
county, including:
(1) workforce housing; and
(2) low–income housing.
(d) (1) A county has a duty to affirmatively further fair housing through the
county’s housing and urban development programs.
(2) The housing element of a comprehensive plan that is enacted or
amended on or after January 1, 2025, shall include an assessment of fair housing to ensure
that the county is affirmatively furthering fair housing.
(3) On request of a county, the Department of Planning, in consultation
with the Department of Housing and Community Development, shall provide technical
assistance for the purpose of developing the housing element of the comprehensive plan.
(4) This subsection does not require a county to take, or prohibit a county
from taking, a specific action to affirmatively further fair housing.
(E) (1) A COUNTY HAS AN AFFIRMATIVE DUTY TO CREATE
OPPORTUNITIES FOR HOUSING BY EVALUATING THE SUITABILITY OF VACANT,
UNUSED, OR UNDERUTILIZED COMMERCIAL OR INDUSTRIAL LAND FOR HOUSING
USE.
(2) THE HOUSING ELEMENT OF A COMPREHENSIVE PLAN THAT IS
ENACTED OR AMENDED ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) AN ASSESSMENT OF THE SUITABILITY OF ALL VACANT,
UNUSED, OR UNDERUTILIZED COMMERCIAL OR INDUSTRIAL LAND FOR HOUSING
USE TO CREATE OPPORTUNITIES FOR MORE HOUSING IN AREAS SERVED BY
EXISTING PUBLIC WATER AND SEWER SYSTEMS; AND
(II) RECOMMENDATIONS TO ALTER LOCAL LAWS AS NECESSARY
TO AUTHORIZE HOUSING USE ON VACANT, UNUSED, OR UNDERUTILIZED
COMMERCIAL OR INDUSTRIAL LAND THAT IS SUITABLE FOR HOUSING USE.
3–114.

HOUSE BILL 778 5
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Affirmatively further fair housing” has the meaning stated in § 2–401
of the Housing and Community Development Article.
(3) “Area median income” has the meaning stated in § 4–1801 of the
Housing and Community Development Article.
(4) “Low–income housing” means housing that is affordable for a household
with an aggregate annual income that is below 60% of the area median income.
(5) “Workforce housing” has the meaning stated in § 4–1801 of the Housing
and Community Development Article.
(b) A housing element may include goals, objectives, policies, plans, and
standards.
(c) A housing element shall address the need for affordable housing within the
local jurisdiction, including:
(1) workforce housing; and
(2) low–income housing.
(d) (1) Local jurisdictions have a duty to affirmatively further fair housing
through their housing and urban development programs.
(2) The housing element of a comprehensive plan that is enacted or
amended on or after January 1, 2023, shall include an assessment of fair housing to ensure
that the local jurisdiction is affirmatively furthering fair housing.
(3) On request of a local jurisdiction, the Department of Planning, in
consultation with the Department of Housing and Community Development, shall provide
technical assistance for the purpose of developing the housing element of the
comprehensive plan.
(4) This subsection does not require a local jurisdiction to take, or prohibit
a local jurisdiction from taking, a specific action to affirmatively further fair housing.
(E) (1) LOCAL JURISDICTIONS HAVE AN AFFIRMATIVE DUTY TO CREATE
OPPORTUNITIES FOR HOUSING BY EVALUATING THE SUITABILITY OF VACANT,
UNUSED, OR UNDERUTILIZED COMMERCIAL OR INDUSTRIAL LAND FOR HOUSING
USE.

HOUSE BILL 778
(2) THE HOUSING ELEMENT OF A COMPREHENSIVE PLAN THAT IS
ENACTED OR AMENDED ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) AN ASSESSMENT OF THE SUITABILITY OF ALL VACANT,
UNUSED, OR UNDERUTILIZED COMMERCIAL OR INDUSTRIAL LAND FOR HOUSING
USE TO CREATE OPPORTUNITIES FOR MORE HOUSING IN AREAS SERVED BY
EXISTING PUBLIC WATER AND SEWER SYSTEMS; AND
(II) RECOMMENDATIONS TO ALTER LOCAL LAWS AS NECESSARY
TO AUTHORIZE HOUSING USE ON VACANT, UNUSED, OR UNDERUTILIZED
COMMERCIAL OR INDUSTRIAL LAND THAT IS SUITABLE FOR HOUSING USE.
SUBTITLE 6. MIDDLE HOUSING.
4–601.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COTTAGE CLUSTER” MEANS A GROUPING, INCLUDING A COMMON
COURTYARD, OF AT LEAST FOUR DETACHED DWELLING UNITS PER ACRE THAT HAVE
A FOOTPRINT OF LESS THAN 900 SQUARE FEET.
(C) “DWELLING UNIT” MEANS A SINGLE UNIT PROVIDING COMPLETE,
INDEPENDENT LIVING FACILITIES FOR AT LEAST ONE INDIVIDUAL THAT INCLUDES
PERMANENT PROVISIONS FOR SANITATION, COOKING, EATING, AND SLEEPING.
(D) “MIDDLE HOUSING” MEANS:
(1) A DUPLEX;
(2) A TRIPLEX;
(3) A QUADPLEX;
(4) A COTTAGE CLUSTER; OR
(5) A TOWN HOUSE.
(E) “TOWN HOUSE” MEANS A DWELLING UNIT THAT IS PART OF A GROUPING
OF AT LEAST THREE DWELLING UNITS CONSTRUCTED IN A ROW, WHERE EACH
DWELLING UNIT:

HOUSE BILL 778 7
(1) IS LOCATED ON AN INDIVIDUAL LOT OR PARCEL; AND
(2) HAS AT LEAST ONE COMMON WALL WITH AN ADJACENT DWELLING
UNIT.
(F) (1) “UNREASONABLE LIMITATION” INCLUDES A LIMITATION THAT
PROHIBITS, EXPLICITLY OR BY EFFECT, THE DEVELOPMENT OF MIDDLE HOUSING.
(2) “UNREASONABLE LIMITATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE A LIMITATION
ON THE SHORT–TERM RENTAL OF A MIDDLE HOUSING UNIT.
(G) “ZONING ADMINISTRATOR” MEANS A LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL UNIT
THAT IS RESPONSIBLE FOR REVIEWING DEVELOPMENT PLANS AND PERMIT
APPLICATIONS FOR CONSISTENCY WITH LOCAL ZONING ORDINANCES.
4–602.
THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES ONLY TO THE DEVELOPMENT OF MIDDLE HOUSING
ON LAND ZONED FOR SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENTIAL USE.
4–603.
(A) IT IS THE POLICY OF THE STATE TO PROMOTE AND ENCOURAGE
BUILDING MIDDLE HOUSING UNITS ON LAND ZONED FOR SINGLE–FAMILY
RESIDENTIAL USE TO MEET THE HOUSING NEEDS OF THE STATE.
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN THIS SUBTITLE AND SUBJECT TO
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT ALTER OR
ABROGATE ANY ZONING POWER OR RELATED AUTHORITY GRANTED TO A LOCAL
JURISDICTION UNDER THIS TITLE.
(2) LOCAL JURISDICTIONS SHALL ESTABLISH POLICIES THAT
FURTHER THE INTENT OF THIS SUBTITLE.
4–604.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A RESTRICTION ON USE ON HISTORIC
PROPERTY THAT IS LISTED IN OR DETERMINED BY THE DIRECTOR OF THE
MARYLAND HISTORICAL TRUST TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR INCLUSION IN THE MARYLAND
REGISTER OF HISTORIC PROPERTIES.

HOUSE BILL 778
(B) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, EACH LOCAL
JURISDICTION WITH LOCAL ZONING AUTHORITY SHALL BY LOCAL LAW ALLOW, BY
RIGHT, MIDDLE HOUSING ON:
(1) ANY INDIVIDUAL LOT, EXISTING BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2015, THAT:
(I) IS LOCATED IN A ZONING DISTRICT THAT ALLOWS
CONSTRUCTION OF SINGLE–FAMILY DETACHED DWELLING UNITS; AND
(II) IS VACANT; AND
(2) AT LEAST 25% OF THE LOTS IN ANY NEW RESIDENTIAL
SUBDIVISION WITH AT LEAST 20 LOTS FOR SINGLE–FAMILY DWELLING UNITS.
(C) (1) A LOCAL LAW ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL:
(I) REQUIRE FRONT, SIDE, AND REAR SETBACKS THAT ARE NOT
GREATER THAN THE SETBACKS REQUIRED FOR A SINGLE–FAMILY DETACHED
DWELLING UNIT IN THE SAME ZONING DISTRICT;
(II) EXEMPT MIDDLE HOUSING FROM MINIMUM LOT SIZE
REQUIREMENTS;
(III) LIMIT MIDDLE HOUSING TO LOCATIONS SERVED BY PUBLIC
WATER AND SEWER SYSTEMS;
(IV) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF THE
ZONING ADMINISTRATOR DETERMINES THAT ADEQUATE ON–STREET PARKING
EXISTS FOR THE PROPOSED MIDDLE HOUSING UNITS, REQUIRE NOT MORE THAN
ONE OFF–STREET PARKING SPACE FOR EACH MIDDLE HOUSING UNIT;
(V) PROVIDE THAT A MIDDLE HOUSING ZONING OR BUILDING
APPLICATION IS SUBJECT TO THE SAME REVIEW AND APPROVAL PROCEDURES
REQUIRED FOR A COMPARABLE SINGLE–FAMILY DETACHED RESIDENTIAL USE
APPLICATION; AND
(VI) REQUIRE THAT MIDDLE HOUSING MEET PUBLIC HEALTH,
SAFETY, AND WELFARE STANDARDS, INCLUDING RELEVANT BUILDING CODES.
(2) A LOCAL LAW ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY REQUIRE
MIDDLE HOUSING TO MEET RELEVANT ADEQUATE PUBLIC FACILITIES
REQUIREMENTS.

HOUSE BILL 778 9
(3) A LOCAL JURISDICTION MAY NOT IMPOSE UNREASONABLE
LIMITATIONS AFFECTING MIDDLE HOUSING APPLICATIONS CONCERNING:
(I) HEIGHT;
(II) SETBACKS;
(III) BULK;
(IV) PARKING;
(V) DIMENSIONS OR AREA; OR
(VI) SIMILAR REQUIREMENTS.
(4) IF THE GUIDELINES WILL NOT IMPOSE AN UNREASONABLE
LIMITATION THAT EFFECTIVELY PROHIBITS MIDDLE HOUSING, A LOCAL
JURISDICTION MAY ESTABLISH GUIDELINES THAT ARE APPROPRIATE FOR LOCAL
CONDITIONS TO ASSIST THE ZONING ADMINISTRATOR IN DETERMINING THE
ADEQUACY OF ON–STREET PARKING.
10–103.
(a) Except as provided in this section, this division does not apply to Baltimore
City.
(b) The following provisions of this division apply to Baltimore City:
(1) this title;
(2) § 1–101(m) (Definitions – “Priority funding area”);
(3) § 1–101(o) (Definitions – “Sensitive area”);
(4) § 1–201 (Visions);
(5) § 1–206 (Required education);
(6) § 1–207 (Annual report – In general);
(7) § 1–208 (Annual report – Measures and indicators);
(8) Title 1, Subtitle 3 (Consistency);

HOUSE BILL 778
(9) Title 1, Subtitle 4, Parts II and III (Home Rule Counties –
Comprehensive Plans; Implementation);
(10) § 4–104(c) (Limitations – Bicycle parking);
(11) § 4–104(d) (Limitations – Manufactured homes and modular dwellings);
(12) § 4–205 (Administrative adjustments);
(13) § 4–208 (Exceptions – Maryland Accessibility Code);
(14) § 4–210 (Permits and variances – Solar panels);
(15) § 4–211 (Change in zoning classification – Energy generating systems);
(16) § 4–215 (Pollinator–friendly vegetation management);
(17) § 4–216 (Limitations – Family child care homes and large family child
care homes);
(18) Title 4, Subtitle 5 (Accessory Dwelling Units);
(19) TITLE 4, SUBTITLE 6 (MIDDLE HOUSING);
(20) § 5–102(d) (Subdivision regulations – Burial sites);
[(20)] (21) Title 7, Subtitle 1 (Development Mechanisms);
[(21)] (22) Title 7, Subtitle 2 (Transfer of Development Rights);
[(22)] (23) Title 7, Subtitle 3 (Development Rights and Responsibilities
Agreements);
[(23)] (24) Title 7, Subtitle 4 (Inclusionary Zoning);
[(24)] (25) Title 7, Subtitle 5 (Housing Expansion and Affordability); and
[(25)] (26) Title 11, Subtitle 2 (Civil Penalty).
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.